Washington statutes.
RCW 36.85.020

Aviation site not exempt from condemnation.

Whenever any county has established a public highway, which, in whole or in part, abuts upon and adjoins any aviation site in such county, no property shall be exempt from condemnation for such highway by reason of the same having been or being dedicated, appropriated, or otherwise reduced or held to public use.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.85.020. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 41 s 1; RRS s 905-2.]